th: วัสดุที่ใช้ทำรองเท้า: ผ้าใบ; สำลี; ขนเทียม; หนังเทียม; ผ้าขนแกะ; หนัง; ผ้าลินิน; ตาข่าย; นีโอพรีน; ไนลอน; พลาสติก; โพลีเอสเตอร์; โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); ยาง; กระดาษเนื้อซาติน; ผ้าไหม; สแปนเด็กซ์; หนังกลับ; สังเคราะห์; เทอร์โมพลาสติกโพลิยูรีเทน (TPU); ผ้าขนสัตว์; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu giày dép: Toan; Vải bông; Lông thú giả; Da giả; Nỉ cào; Da; Lanh; Lưới; Neoprene; Nylon; Nhựa; Polyester; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cao su; Satin; Lụa; Vải Spandex; Da lộn; Tổng hợp; Polyurethane nhiệt dẻo (TPU); Len; Khác
hu: Lábbeli anyaga: Vászon; Pamut; Műszőrme; Műbőr; Gyapjú; Bőr; Lenvászon; Háló; Neoprén; Nejlon; Műanyag; Poliészter; Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Gumi; Szatén; Selyem; Spandex; Szarvasbőr; Szintetikus; Hőre lágyuló poliuretán (TPU); Gyapjú; Egyéb
el: Υλικό υποδημάτων: Καμβάς; Βαμβάκι; Συνθετική γούνα; Συνθετικό δέρμα; Φλις; Δέρμα; Λινό; Πλέγμα; Νεοπρένιο; Νάιλον; Πλαστικό; Πολυεστέρας; Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καουτσούκ; Σατέν; Μετάξι; Σπαντέξ; Καστόρι; Συνθετικό; Θερμοπλαστική πολυουρεθάνη (TPU); Μαλλί; Άλλο
bg-BG: Материал за обувки: Брезент; Памук; Изкуствена козина; Изкуствена кожа; Полар; Кожа; Лен; Мрежа; Неопрен; Найлон; Пластмаса; Полиестер; Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Каучук; Сатен; Коприна; Спандекс; Набук; Синтетичен; Термопластичен полиуретан (TPU); Вълна; Други
nb: Fottøymateriale: Lerret; Bomull; Fuskepels; Kunstig lær; Fleece; Skinn; Lin; Mesh; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Sateng; Silke; Spandex; Semsket; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Ull; Annen
lt-LT: Avalynės medžiaga: Drobė; Medvilnė; Dirbtinis kailis; Dirbtinė oda; Flisas; Oda; Lininis audinys; Tinklelis; Neoprenas; Nailonas; Plastikas; Poliesteris; Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Kaučiukas; Satinas; Šilkas; Elastanas; Zomša; Sintetika; Termoplastinis poliuretanas (TPU); Vilna; Kita
en: Footwear material: Canvas; Cotton; Faux fur; Faux leather; Fleece; Leather; Linen; Mesh; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Rubber; Satin; Silk; Spandex; Suede; Synthetic; Thermoplastic polyurethane (TPU); Wool; Other
ru: Материал обуви: Холщовая ткань; Хлопок; Искусственный мех; Искусственная кожа; Флис; Кожа; Лен; Сетка; Неопрен; Нейлон; Пластик; Полиэстер; Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Резина; Сатин; Шелк; Спандекс; Замша; Синтетика; Термопластичный полиуретан (ТПУ); Шерсть; Другой
pl: Materiał obuwia: Płótno; Bawełna; Sztuczne futro; Skaj; Polar; Skórzane; Bielizna pościelowa; Siatka; Neopren; Nylon; Tworzywo sztuczne; Poliester; Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Guma; Satyna; Jedwab; Spandex; Zamsz; Syntetyczne; Poliuretan termoplastyczny (TPU); Wełna; Pozostałe
sv: Skor - material: Kanvas; Bomull; Fuskpäls; Fuskläder; Fleece; Läder; Linne; Mesh; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Satin; Silke; Spandex; Mocka; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk polyuretan (TPU); Ylle; Annat
da: Fodtøjsmateriale: Lærred; Bomuld; Kunstskind; Kunstigt læder; Fleece; Læder; Linned; Mesh; Neopren; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Gummi; Satin; Silke; Spandex; Ruskind; Syntetisk; Termoplastisk polyurethan (TPU); Uld; Andet
es: Material del calzado: Lienzo; Algodón; Piel sintética; Cuero sintético; Vellón; Cuero; Lino; Malla; Neopreno; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Goma; Satinado; Seda; Spandex; Gamuzado; Sintético; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Lana; Otros
it: Materiale per calzature: Tela; Cotone; Pelliccia ecologica; Ecopelle; Felpa; Pelle; Lino; Mesh; Neoprene; Nylon; Plastica; Poliestere; Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Gomma; Satinato; Seta; Spandex; Pelle scamosciata; Sintetico; Poliuretano termoplastico (TPU); Lana; Altro
ja: 履物の材質: キャンバス; コットン; フェイクファー; フェイクレザー; フリース; レザー; リネン; メッシュ; ネオプレン; ナイロン; プラスチック; ポリエステル; ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); ゴム; サテン; シルク; スパンデックス; スエード; 合成品; 熱可塑性ポリウレタン (TPU); ウール; その他
fr: Matériau des chaussures: Toiles; Coton; Fausse fourrure; Faux cuir; Polaire; Cuir; Lin; A mailles; Néoprène; Nylon; Plastique; Polyester; Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Caoutchouc; Satiné; Soie; Spandex; Suède; Synthétique; Polyuréthane thermoplastique (TPU); Laine; Autre
ro-RO: Material încălțăminte: Pânză; Bumbac; Blană artificială; Imitație de piele; Polar; Piele; In; Plasă; Neopren; Nailon; Plastic; Poliester; Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Cauciuc; Satin; Mătase; Spandex; Piele întoarsă; Sintetic; Poliuretan termoplastic (TPU); Lână; Altele
zh-CN: 鞋履材质: 画布; 棉布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮革; 羊毛; 皮革; 亚麻; 网状; 氯丁橡胶; 尼龙; 塑料; 聚酯纤维; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡胶; 缎; 丝绸; 氨纶; 小牛皮; 合成; 热塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 羊毛; 其他
ko: 신발 소재: 캔버스; 면; 인조 모피; 인조 가죽; 플리스; 가죽; 린넨; 메쉬; 네오프렌; 나일론; 플라스틱; 폴리에스테르; 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 고무; 새틴; 실크; 스판덱스; 스웨이드; 인조; 열가소성 폴리우레탄(TPU); 울; 기타
fi: Jalkineiden materiaali: Kanvaasi; Puuvilla; Tekoturkis; Keinonahka; Fleece; Nahka; Pellava; Verkko; Neopreeni; Nailon; Muovi; Polyesteri; Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Kumi; Satiini; Silkki; Spandex; Mokka; Synteettinen; Termoplastinen polyuretaani (TPU); Villa; Muu
pt-BR: Material do calçado: Tela; Algodão; Pele sintetica; Couro falso; Lã; Couro; Linho; Malha; Neoprene; Nylon; Plástico; Poliéster; Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Borracha; Cetim; Seda; Spandex; Camurça; Sintético; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Lã; Outro
cs: Materiál obuvi: Plátno; Bavlna; Nepravá kožešina; Nepravá kůže; Flís; Kůže; Len; Síťovina; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Satén; Hedvábí; Spandex; Semiš; Syntetické; Termoplastický polyuretan (TPU); Vlna; Jiné
sl-SI: Material obutve: Platno; Bombaž; Umetno krzno; Umetno usnje; Flis; Usnje; Lan; Mreža; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Polivinilklorid (PVC); Guma; Saten; Svila; Spandex; Semiš; Sintetika; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Volna; Drugo
zh-TW: 鞋履材質: 帆布; 棉布; 人造毛皮; 人造皮; 刷毛布; 皮製; 亞麻; 網布; 氯丁橡膠; 尼龍; 塑膠; 聚酯; 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 橡膠; 緞面布; 絲綢; 氨綸; 麂皮; 合成; 熱塑性聚氨酯 (TPU); 羊毛; 其他
tr: Ayakkabı malzemesi: Tuval; Pamuk; Sahte kürk; Suni deri; Yapağı; Deri; Keten; Ağ; Neopren; Plastik; Plastik; Poliyester; Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kauçuk; Saten; İpek; Spandeks; Süet; Sentetik; Termoplastik poliüretan (TPU); Yünlüler; Diğer
sk-SK: Materiál obuvi: Plátno; Bavlna; Umelá kožušina; Umelá koža; Flís; Koža; Ľan; Sieťovina; Neoprén; Nylon; Plast; Polyester; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Guma; Satén; Hodváb; Elastan; Semiš; Syntetický; Termoplastický polyuretán (TPU); Vlna; Iné
hr-HR: Materijal obuće: Platno; Pamuk; Umjetno krzno; Umjetna koža; Flis; Koža; Lan; Mrežica; Neopren; Najlon; Plastika; Poliester; Polivinil klorid (PVC); Guma; Saten; Svila; Elastan; Antilop; Sintetika; Termoplastični poliuretan (TPU); Vuna; Ostalo
de: Schuhmaterial: Leinwand; Baumwolle; Kunstpelz; Kunstleder; Vlies; Leder; Leinen; Netz; Neopren; Nylon; Kunststoff; Polyester; Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Gummi; Seidenmatt; Seide; Elasthan; Wildleder; Synthetisch; Thermoplastisches Polyurethan (TPU); Wolle; Sonstiges
pt-PT: Material do calçado: Tela; Algodão; Peles sintéticas; Couro falso; Velo; Pele; Linho; Rede; Neoprene; Náilon; Plástico; Poliéster; Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Borracha; Acetinado; Seda; Elastano; Camurça; Sintético; Poliuretano termoplástico (TPU); Lã; Outro
nl: Materiaal schoenen: Canvas; Katoen; Nepbont; Kunstleer; Fleece; Leer; Linnen; Gaas; Neopreen; Nylon; Plastic; Polyester; Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Rubber; Satijn; Zijde; Spandex; Suède; Synthetisch; Thermoplastisch polyurethaan (TPU); Wol; Andere